Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.360

No recovery of damages when probable cause.

No state court shall allow the recovery of damages from administrative action taken or for "stop sale, use or removal" if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 36.]